Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-157
Logan.

The county of Logan is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township seventeen, north, of range twenty-six, west, of the sixth principal meridian; running thence west along the north line of Lincoln County to the southwest corner of township seventeen, north, range twenty-nine, west; thence north to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, range twenty-nine, west; thence east to the northeast corner of township twenty, north, range twenty-six, west; thence south along the west line of Custer County to the point of beginning.

Laws 1885, c. 33, § 1, p. 207;

R.S.1913, § 870;

C.S.1922, § 772;

C.S.1929, § 25-159;

R.S.1943, § 22-157.